apertium-sv-da/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
<pardef n="l/us__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usen</l>      <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usens</l>     <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öss</l>       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öss</l>       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>össen</l>     <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>össens</l>    <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="data__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ns</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ts</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nas</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="v"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tors/o__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ons</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oer</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>or</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oers</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ors</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oerna</l>     <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orna</l>      <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ernas</l>     <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oernas</l>    <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ornas</l>     <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dus__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ernas</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="h__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>h</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ets</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ts</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:ets</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:ts</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:ns</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ns</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-nas</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:nas</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="väglus">          <i>vägl</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="elefantnäbbmus">  <i>elefantnäbbm</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="flädermus">       <i>fläderm</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="data">            <i>data</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="torso">           <i>tors</i><par n="tors/o__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="linslus">         <i>linsl</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="mjukdata">        <i>mjukdata</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="elementa">        <i>elementa</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="teledata">        <i>teledata</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="karakteristika">  <i>karakteristika</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="h">               <i>h</i><par n="h__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="granbarrlus">     <i>granbarrl</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="analgetika">      <i>analgetika</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="bladlus">         <i>bladl</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="prestanda">       <i>prestanda</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="geodata">         <i>geodata</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="pretiosa">        <i>pretiosa</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="antiseptika">     <i>antiseptika</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="antecedentia">    <i>antecedentia</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="psykofarmaka">    <i>psykofarmaka</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="hårddata">        <i>hårddata</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="ataraktika">      <i>ataraktika</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="hasselmus">       <i>hasselm</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="lus">             <i>l</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sköldlus">        <i>sköldl</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="neuroleptika">    <i>neuroleptika</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="anestetika">      <i>anestetika</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="varufakta">       <i>varufakta</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="vägglus">         <i>väggl</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="karaktäristika">  <i>karaktäristika</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="flatlus">         <i>flatl</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="lacksköldlus">    <i>lacksköldl</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="fladdermus">      <i>fladderm</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="farmaka">         <i>farmaka</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="skogsmus">        <i>skogsm</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="dus">             <i>dus</i><par n="dus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="vinlus">          <i>vinl</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="näbbmus">         <i>näbbm</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ullus">           <i>ull</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="personalia">      <i>personalia</i><par n="data__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="klädlus">         <i>klädl</i><par n="l/us__n_ut"/></e>
